Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.088, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Program authority; funding. (a) As provided in this section, the commissioner must establish a corridors of commerce program for trunk highway construction, reconstruction, and improvement, including maintenance operations, that improves commerce in the state. (b) The commissioner may expend funds under the program from appropriations to the commissioner that are: (1) made specifically by law for use under this section; (2) new text begin reallocated efficiency savings from section 174.53, paragraph (b);new text end new text begin (3) new text end at the discretion of the commissioner, made for the budget activities in the state roads program of operations and maintenance, program planning and delivery, or state road construction; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end made for the corridor investment management strategy program, unless specified otherwise. (c) The commissioner must include in the program the cost participation policy for local units of government. (d) The commissioner may use up to 17 percent of any appropriation under this section for program delivery and for project scoring, ranking, and selection under subdivision 5. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to funds reallocated on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 174.53, is amended to read: 174.53 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION EFFICIENCIES. (a) Beginning in fiscal years 2018 and 2019, the commissioner of transportation must implement efficiencies equal to at least 15 percent of the appropriations made annually to the commissioner from the trunk highway fund that are above base appropriations for fiscal years 2018 and 2019. (b) The efficiency savings resulting from the requirements in paragraph (a) deleted text begin aredeleted text end new text begin must be usednew text end for the construction, maintenance, or rehabilitation of trunk highwaysdeleted text begin , including roads and bridgesdeleted text end new text begin under the corridors of commerce program under section 161.088new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to funds reallocated on or after that date. new text end